District of Columbia statutes.
29A-201.06

Repealed

Trustees — Effect of failure to hold election of trustees at designated time.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1285, ch. 854, § 610
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-201.06.
1981 Ed., § 29-206.
1973 Ed., § 29-206.